Mississippi, session 2026, SB3402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Corderro Martin of Harrison County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of felony shoplifting on June 19, 2014, in Harrison County, Mississippi.  He was sentenced to serve a term of ten (10) years in the custody of the Department of Corrections, including attendance and successful completion of the "'Long Term' Drug and Alcohol Rehabilitation Program."  On June 30, 2016, Martin was convicted of conspiracy to introduce a controlled substance in Greene County, Mississippi.  He was sentenced to serve five (5) years with three (3) years and three hundred sixty-four (364) days suspended in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. On August 31, 2016, he was paroled.  On September 8, 2020, he was discharged from the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He has completed all terms and conditions of his sentence. The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.